California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(2) “Street light pole” means a pole, arm, or fixture used primarily for street, pedestrian, or security lighting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 616, Sec. 2.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Publicly Owned Utilities [385. - 386.]

385.

(a) Each local publicly owned electric utility shall establish a nonbypassable, usage based charge on local distribution service of not less than the lowest expenditure level of the three largest electrical corporations in California on a percent of revenue basis, calculated from each utility’s total revenue requirement for the year ended December 31, 1994, and each utility’s total annual expenditure under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 381 and Section 382, to fund investments by the utility and other parties in any or all of the following:

(1) Cost-effective demand-side management services to promote energy efficiency and energy conservation.

(2) New investment in renewable energy resources and technologies consistent with existing statutes and regulations which promote those resources and technologies.

(3) Research, development and demonstration programs for the public interest to advance science or technology which is not adequately provided by competitive and regulated markets.

(4) Services provided for low-income electricity customers, including, but not limited to, energy efficiency services, education, weatherization, and rate discounts.

(b) Each local publicly owned electric utility that has not implemented programs for low-income electricity customers including targeted energy efficiency services and rate discounts based upon the income level of the customer, or completed an assessment of need for those programs, on or before December 31, 2000, shall perform a needs assessment for the programs described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) and shall hold one or more public meetings, after notice, to review the findings of the needs assessment. Following the public meetings, the governing body of the local publicly owned electric utility shall determine the amount of the total funds collected pursuant to this section to be allocated to low-income programs, including, but not limited to, targeted energy efficiency services, education, weatherization, and rate discounts. In making its decision on the need for the programs, the governing body shall consider all of the following:

(1) The number and income level of low-income customers that reside in the service area of the utility.

(2) The availability of home weatherization services to low-income customers pursuant to Section 2790.

(3) The availability of in-home energy efficiency education in the utility’s service area.

(4) Other factors that may indicate a need for low-income services.

(c) Following a determination pursuant to subdivision (b) that low-income services are needed, the local publicly owned utility shall promptly implement or expand those programs. The local publicly owned electric utility shall work with existing weatherization providers to implement energy efficiency, education, and weatherization programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1041, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

386.

(a) Each local publicly owned electric utility shall ensure the following:

(1) Low-income families within the utility’s service territory have access to affordable electricity.

(2) The current level of assistance reflects the level of need.

(3) Low-income families are afforded no-cost and low-cost energy efficiency measures that reduce energy consumption.

(b) The local publicly owned electric utility shall consider increasing the level of the discount or raising the eligibility level for any existing rate assistance program to be reflective of customer need.

(c) A publicly owned electric utility shall streamline enrollment for low-income programs by collaborating with existing providers for the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) and other electric or gas providers within the same service territory.

(d) A local publicly owned electric utility shall establish participation goals for its rate assistance program participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 3.   Effective August 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5 Provider of Last Resort [387. - 387.]

387.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Carbon-free electrical resource” means a source of electrical generation that emits no greenhouse gases when generating electricity that is deliverable to retail end-use customers in California.

(2) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 380.

(3) “Provider of last resort” means a load-serving entity that the commission determines meets the minimum requirements of this article and designates to provide electrical service to any retail customer whose service is transferred to the designated load-serving entity because the
 customer’s load-serving entity failed to provide, or denied, service to the customer or otherwise failed to meet its obligations.

(b) The provider of last resort shall be the electrical corporation in its service territory unless provided otherwise in a service territory boundary agreement entered into pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 8101) of Chapter 6 of Division 4, or unless another load-serving entity is designated by the commission pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d).

(c) The commission may designate a load-serving entity other than the electrical corporation to serve as a provider of last resort in the electrical corporation’s service territory by approving a joint application by the electrical corporation and the load-serving entity that proposes to become the new provider of last resort in the electrical corporation’s service territory. The application may
 request a transfer of the responsibilities of the provider of last resort for the entire service territory of the electrical corporation or for a portion of that service territory. The application shall include all of the following:

(1) A demonstrated ability by the load-serving entity seeking to become the new provider of last resort to post a bond sufficient to meet the minimum threshold established pursuant to subdivision (e).

(2) A demonstrated history of contracting for electricity and access to carbon-free electrical resources by the load-serving entity seeking to become provider of last resort.

(3) A viable plan for meeting the resource adequacy requirements established pursuant to Section 380, the requirements of the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section
 399.11)), and all other load-serving entity procurement requirements.

(4) A history of the load-serving entity seeking to become the provider of last resort participating in, and complying with the requirements of, the integrated resource planning process pursuant to Sections 454.51, 454.52, and 454.54, and all other load-serving entity procurement requirements.

(5) The full disclosure by the load-serving entity seeking to become the provider of last resort of any fines or penalties imposed by, or violations of law found by, any regulatory body of any state or territory, or the federal government.

(6) A detailed history of the safety record of the load-serving entity seeking to become the provider of last resort.

(7) An implementation plan to provide
 for universal access, equitable treatment of all classes of customers, and other customer protections including electric service disconnection procedures consistent with Sections 718 and 779.3.

(d) The commission shall develop a process to facilitate a joint application from load-serving entities that are not electrical corporations to request to transfer the responsibilities of the provider of last resort. This process shall apply when one load-serving entity that is not an electrical corporation has already been designated as a provider of last resort, as described in subdivision (c). The commission may approve a joint application by the designated provider of last resort and the load-serving entity that proposes to become the new provider of last resort in the service territory. The application may request a transfer of responsibilities of the provider of last resort for the entire service territory or for a portion of that service
 territory. The application shall include all of the elements described in subdivision (c). All of the requirements of this article are applicable to the load-serving entity that proposes to become the new provider of last resort in the applicable service territory.

(e) While a load-serving entity is serving as the new provider of last resort pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d), the commission shall not enforce the provider of last resort requirements on the former provider or providers of last resort.

(f) The commission shall develop additional threshold attributes for a load-serving entity other than an electrical corporation to serve as a provider of last resort to retail end-use customers in California that include all of the following:

(1) Minimum insurance requirements.

(2) Minimum financial requirements necessary to provide electricity to retail end-use customers in each service territory.

(3) Compliance with resource adequacy requirements pursuant to Section 380, requirements of the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11)), integrated resource planning requirements pursuant to Sections 454.51, 454.52, and 454.54, and all other state-mandated procurement requirements.

(4) Electric service disconnection rules pursuant to Sections 718 and 779.3.

(5) Any additional minimum requirements that the commission determines are needed to ensure that the provider of last resort will perform its obligation to serve.

(g) The commission shall ensure that the provider of last resort for each service territory receives reasonable cost recovery for being designated and serving as a provider of last resort.

(h) To ensure continued achievement of California’s greenhouse gas emission reduction and air quality goals, and continued accounting of emissions of greenhouse gases for California pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 38530) of Division 25.5 of the Health and Safety Code and other emissions reporting programs, in preparation for an unplanned customer migration to a provider of last resort, the commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, may do both of the following:

(1) Establish rules for all load-serving entities in preparation of any potentially large and unplanned customer migration.

(2) Recommend to agencies modifications to relevant regulations.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, electrical corporations shall continue to provide all metering, billing, and collection to retail customers served by the provider of last resort. Bills sent by an electrical corporation to retail customers shall identify the designated provider of last resort. The commission shall determine the terms and conditions under which the electrical corporation provides these services to the provider of last resort.

(j) The commission shall supervise and regulate each provider of last resort, as necessary, as a public utility for the services provided by the provider of last resort pursuant to this article to ensure the provision of electrical service to customers without disruption if a load-serving entity fails to provide, or denies, service to any retail end-use customer in
 California for any reason. The commission may do all things that are necessary and convenient in the exercise of this power.

(k) This section does not limit the authority of the commission to regulate the terms of service or establish requirements for provider of last resort service by an electrical corporation or any new provider of last resort.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 247.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. State Agencies [388. - 388.]

388.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a state agency may enter into an energy savings contract with a qualified energy service company for the purchase or exchange of thermal or electrical energy or water, or to acquire energy efficiency or water conservation services, or both energy efficiency and water conservation services for a term not exceeding 35 years, at rates and upon those terms approved by the agency.

(b) The Department of General Services or any other state or local agency intending to enter into an energy savings contract or a contract for an energy retrofit project may establish a pool of qualified energy service companies based on qualifications, experience,
 pricing, or other pertinent factors. Energy service contracts for individual projects undertaken by any state or local agency may be awarded through a competitive selection process to individuals or firms identified in the pool. The pool of qualified energy service companies and contractors shall be reestablished at least every two years or shall expire.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) “Energy retrofit project” means a project for which the state or local agency works with a qualified energy service company to identify, develop, design, and implement energy conservation measures in existing facilities to reduce energy or water use or make more efficient use of energy or water.

(B) “Energy retrofit project” does not include the erection or installation
 of a power generation system, a power purchase agreement, or a project utilizing a site license or lease agreement.

(2) “Energy savings” means a measured and verified reduction in fuel, energy, or water consumption when compared to an established baseline of consumption.

(3) “Qualified energy service company” means a company with a demonstrated ability to provide or arrange for building or facility energy auditors, selection and design of appropriate energy savings measures, project financing, implementation of these measures, and maintenance and ongoing measurement of these measures as to ensure and verify energy savings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 341, Sec. 7.   (SB 840)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Nonutility Power Generators [390. - 390.1.]

390.

(a) Subject to applicable contractual terms, energy prices paid to nonutility power generators by a public utility electrical corporation based upon the commission’s prescribed “short run avoided cost energy methodology” shall be determined as set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) Until the requirements of subdivision (c) have been satisfied, short run avoided cost energy payments paid to nonutility power generators by an electrical corporation shall be based on a formula that reflects a starting energy price, adjusted monthly to reflect changes in a starting gas index price in relation to an average of current California natural gas border price indices. The starting energy price shall be based on 12-month averages of recent, pre-January 1, 1996, short-run avoided energy prices paid by each public utility electrical corporation to nonutility power generators. The starting gas index price shall be established as an average of index gas prices for the same annual periods.

(c) The short-run avoided cost energy payments paid to nonutility power generators by electrical corporations shall be based on the clearing price paid by the independent Power Exchange if (1) the commission has issued an order determining that the independent Power Exchange is functioning properly for the purposes of determining the short-run avoided cost energy payments to be made to nonutility power generators, and either (2) the fossil-fired generation units owned, directly or indirectly, by the public utility electrical corporation are authorized to charge market-based rates and the “going forward” costs of those units are being recovered solely through the clearing prices paid by the independent Power Exchange or from contracts with the Independent System Operator, whether those contracts are market-based or based on operating costs for particular utility-owned powerplant units and at particular times when reactive power/voltage support is not yet procurable at market-based rates at locations where it is needed, and are not being recovered directly or indirectly through any other source, or (3) the public utility electrical corporation has divested 90 percent of its gas-fired generation facilities that were operated to meet load in 1994 and 1995. However, nonutility power generators subject to this section may, upon appropriate notice to the public utility electrical corporation, exercise a one-time option to elect to thereafter receive energy payments based upon the clearing price from the independent Power Exchange.

(d) If a nonutility power generator is being paid short-run avoided costs energy payments by an electrical corporation by a firm capacity contract, a forecast as-available capacity contract, or a forecast as-delivered capacity contract on the basis of the clearing price paid by the independent Power Exchange as described in subdivision (c) above, the value of capacity in the clearing price, if any, shall not be paid to the nonutility power generator. The value of capacity in the clearing price, if any, equals the difference between the market clearing customer demand bid at the level of generation dispatched by the independent Power Exchange and the highest supplier bid dispatched.

(e) Short-run avoided energy cost payments made pursuant to this section are in addition to contractually specified capacity payments. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect, modify or amend the terms and conditions of existing nonutility power generators’ contracts with respect to the sale of energy or capacity or otherwise.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the level of transition cost recovery provided to utilities under electric industry restructuring policies established by the commission.

(g) The term “going forward costs” shall include, but not be limited to, all costs associated with fuel transportation and fuel supply, administrative and general, and operation and maintenance; provided that, for purposes of this section, the following shall not be considered “going forward costs”: (1) commission-approved capital costs for capital additions to fossil-fueled powerplants, provided that such additions are necessary for the continued operation of the powerplants utilized to meet load and such additions are not undertaken primarily to expand, repower or enhance the efficiency of plant operations; or, (2) commission-approved operating costs for particular utility-owned powerplant units and at particular times when reactive power/voltage support is not yet procurable at market-based rates in locations where it is needed, provided that the recovery shall end on December 31, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

390.1.

Any nonutility power generator using renewable fuels that has entered into a contract with an electrical corporation prior to December 31, 2001, specifying fixed energy prices for five years of output may negotiate a contract for an additional five years of fixed energy payments upon expiration of the initial five-year term, at a price to be determined by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Information Practices [391. - 392.1.]

391.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Electricity is essential to the health, safety, and economic well-being of all California consumers.

(b) The restructuring of the electricity industry will create a new electricity market with new marketers and sellers offering new goods and services, many of which may not be readily evaluated by the average consumer.

(c) It is important that these customers be protected from unfair marketing practices and that market participants demonstrate their creditworthiness and technical expertise in order to engage in power sales to these members of the public.

(d) Larger commercial and industrial customers are sophisticated energy consumers that have adequate civil remedies and are adequately protected by existing commercial law, as demonstrated by the absence of significant amounts of contract litigation between commercial and industrial natural gas users and natural gas marketers in California.

(e) It is important to create a market structure that will not unduly burden new entrants into the competitive electric market, or California may not receive the full benefits of reduced electricity costs through competition.

(f) It is appropriate to create a system of registration and consumer protection for the electric industry, designed to ensure sufficient protection for residential and small commercial consumers while simplifying entry into the market for responsible entities serving larger, more sophisticated customers.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) Electricity consumers be provided with sufficient and reliable information to be able to compare and select among products and services provided in the electricity market.

(2) Consumers be provided with mechanisms to protect themselves from marketing practices that are unfair or abusive.

(3) Pursuant to the authority granted to the commission in this part as to registration and consumer protection matters, the commission shall balance the need to maximize competition by reducing barriers to entry into the small retail electricity procurement market with the need to protect small consumers against deceptive, unfair, or abusive business practices, or insolvency of the entity offering retail electric service.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to further the policies of AB 1890 (Chapter 854, Statutes of 1996) relating to electric industry restructuring.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 275, Sec. 8.   Effective August 15, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

392.

(a) (1) Electrical corporations shall disclose each component of the electrical bill as follows:

(A) The total charges associated with transmission and distribution, including that portion comprising the research, environmental, and low-income funds.

(B) The total charges associated with generation, including the competition transition charge.

(2) Electrical corporations shall provide conspicuous notice that if the customer elects to purchase electricity from another provider that customer will continue to be liable for payment of the competition transition charge. This paragraph does not prohibit the commission from requiring additional information.

(b) Prior to the implementation of the competition transition charge, electric corporations, in conjunction with the commission, shall devise and implement a customer education program informing customers of the changes to the electric industry. The program shall provide customers with information necessary to help them make appropriate choices as to their electric service. The education program shall be subject to approval by the commission.

(c) The standard bill format developed by the commission pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 394.4 shall also apply to electrical corporations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 275, Sec. 10.   Effective August 15, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

392.1.

(a) The commission shall compile and regularly update the names and contact numbers of registered providers.

(b) (1) The commission shall also compile and regularly update information to assist consumers in making service choices and the number of customer complaints against specific providers in relation to the number of customers served by those providers and the disposition of those complaints. To facilitate this function, registered entities shall file with the commission information describing the terms and conditions of any standard service plan made available to residential and small commercial customers. The commission shall adopt a standard format for
 this filing. The commission shall maintain and make generally available a list of entities offering electrical services operating in California. This list shall include all registered providers and those providers not required to be registered who request the commission to be included in the list. The commission shall, upon request, make this information available at no charge. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, public agencies that are registered entities shall be required to disclose their terms and conditions of service contracts only to the same extent that other registered entities would be required to disclose the same or similar service contracts.

(2) The commission shall issue public alerts about companies attempting to provide electric service in the state in an unauthorized or fraudulent manner as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 394.25.

(3) (A) This subdivision is inoperative except for time periods in which providers are authorized to offer service to residential customers and the combined enrollments in competitive retail electric service in the service territories of the Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Southern California Edison Company, and San Diego Gas and Electric Company increase at a rate of more than 5 percent per month.

(B) The commission shall notify, in writing, the Secretary of State at the beginning and end of any time period described in subparagraph (A).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.   (SB 656)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Consumer Protection [394. - 396.5.]

394.

(a) As used in this section, “electric service provider” means an entity that offers electrical service to customers within the service territory of an electrical corporation, but does not include an electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218, does not include an entity that offers electrical service solely to serve customer load consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 218, and does not include a public agency that offers electrical service to residential and small commercial customers within its jurisdiction, or within the service territory of a local publicly owned electric utility. “Electric service provider” includes the unregulated affiliates and subsidiaries of an electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218.

(b) Each electric service provider shall register with the commission. As a precondition to registration, the electric service provider shall provide, under oath, declaration, or affidavit, all of the following information to the commission:

(1) Legal name and any other names under which the electric service provider is doing business in California.

(2) Current telephone number.

(3) Current address.

(4) Agent for service of process.

(5) State and date of incorporation, if any.

(6) Number for a customer contact representative, or other personnel for receiving customer inquiries.

(7) Brief description of the nature of the service being provided.

(8) Disclosure of any civil, criminal, or regulatory sanctions or penalties imposed within the 10 years immediately prior to registration, against the company or any owner, partner, officer, or director of the company pursuant to any state or federal consumer protection law or regulation, and of any felony convictions of any kind against the company or any owner, partner, officer, or director of the company. In addition, each electric service provider shall furnish the commission with fingerprints for those owners, partners, officers, and managers of the electric service provider specified by any commission decision applicable to all electric service providers. The commission shall submit completed fingerprint cards to the Department of Justice. Those fingerprints shall be available for use by the Department of Justice and the Department of Justice may transmit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The commission may use information obtained from a national criminal history record check conducted pursuant to this section to determine an electric service provider’s eligibility for registration.

(9) Proof of financial viability. The commission shall develop uniform standards for determining financial viability and shall publish those standards for public comment no later than March 31, 1998. In determining the financial viability of the electric service provider, the commission shall take into account the number of customers the potential registrant expects to serve, the number of kilowatthours of electricity it expects to provide, and any other appropriate criteria to ensure that residential and small commercial customers have adequate recourse in the event of fraud or nonperformance.

(10) Proof of technical and operational ability. The commission shall develop uniform standards for determining technical and operational capacity and shall publish those standards for public comment no later than March 31, 1998.

(c) Any registration filing approved by the commission prior to the effective date of this section which does not comply in all respects with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 394 shall nevertheless continue in force and effect so long as within 90 days of the effective date of this section the electric service provider undertakes to supplement its registration filing to the satisfaction of the commission. Any registration that is not supplemented by the required information within the time set forth in this subdivision shall be suspended by the commission and shall not be reinstated until the commission has found the registration to be in full compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 394.

(d) Any public agency offering aggregation services as provided for in Section 366 solely to retail electric customers within its jurisdiction that has registered with the commission prior to the enactment of this section may voluntarily withdraw its registration to the extent that it is exempted from registration under this chapter.

(e) Before reentering the market, electric service providers whose registration has been revoked shall file a formal application with the commission that satisfies the requirements set forth in Section 394.1 and demonstrates the fitness and ability of the electric service provider to comply with all applicable rules of the commission.

(f) Registration with the commission is an exercise of the licensing function of the commission, and does not constitute regulation of the rates or terms and conditions of service offered by electric service providers. Nothing in this part authorizes the commission to regulate the rates or terms and conditions of service offered by electric service providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 838, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

394.1.

(a) The registration shall be deemed approved and a registration number issued no later than 45 days after the required information has been submitted, unless the commission’s executive director finds, upon review of the information submitted by the electric service provider or available to the commission, that there is evidence to support a finding that the electric service provider has committed an act constituting grounds for denial of registration as specifically set forth in the operative provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, subdivision (c).

(b) Upon a finding by the commission’s executive director that there is evidence to support a finding that the electric service provider has committed an act constituting grounds for denial of registration as set forth in this section, the commission shall notify the electric service provider in writing, cause the documents submitted by the electric service provider to be filed as a formal application for registration, and notice an expedited hearing on the registration of the electric service provider to be held within 30 days of the notification to the electric service provider of the executive director’s finding of evidence to support denial of registration. The commission shall, within 45 days after holding the hearing, issue a decision on the registration request which shall be based on the findings of fact and conclusions of law based on the evidence presented at the hearing. The decision shall include the findings of fact and the conclusions of law relied upon.

(c) (1) The commission may deny an application for registration in accordance with subdivision (b) on the grounds that the electric service provider or any officer or director of the electric service provider has one or more of the following:

(A) Been convicted of a crime as described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 394.

(B) Failure to make a sufficient showing with respect to paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 394.

(C) Knowingly made a false statement of fact in the application for registration.

(2) The commission may deny registration pursuant to this subdivision only if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties required to provide retail electric service to end use customers of electricity or the false statement is material to the registration application. For purposes of this subdivision, conviction of a crime shall be established in the same manner as that set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 480 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) The commission shall require electric service providers registered under this section to update their registration information set forth in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 394 within 60 days of any material change in the information provided. Material changes to any other information required pursuant to this article shall be updated annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 10.1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

394.2.

(a) The commission shall accept, compile, and attempt to informally resolve consumer complaints regarding electric service providers. Where the commission reasonably suspects a pattern of customer abuses, the commission may, on its own motion, initiate investigations into the activities of electric service providers offering electrical service. Consumer complaints regarding service by a public agency offering electric service within the political boundary of the public agency or service territory of a local publicly owned electric utility shall continue to be resolved by the public agency. Within the service territory of a local publicly owned utility, consumer complaints arising from the violation of direct access rules adopted by the governing body of the local publicly owned utility shall be resolved through the local publicly owned utility’s consumer complaint procedures.

(b) Notwithstanding other provisions, residential and small commercial customers shall have the option to proceed with a complaint against an electric service provider either through an action filed in the judicial court system or through a complaint filed with the commission. A customer who elects either the judicial or commission remedies may not raise the same claim in both forums. The commission shall have the authority to accept, compile, and resolve residential, and small commercial consumer complaints, including the authority to award reparations. The commission’s authority in these complaint proceedings is limited to adjudication of complaints regarding residential and small commercial electric service provided by an electric service provider and shall not be expanded to include either an award of any other damages or regulation of the rates or charges of the electric service provider. However, a person or electric service provider that takes a conflict to the commission shall not be precluded from pursuing an appeal of the decision through the courts as provided for in law.

(c) In connection with customer complaints or commission investigations into customer abuses, electric service providers shall provide the commission access to their accounts, books, papers, and documents related to California transactions as described in Sections 313 and 314, provided the information is relevant to the complaint or investigation.

(d) No electric service provider may discontinue service to a customer for a disputed amount if that customer has filed a complaint that is pending with the commission, and that customer has paid the disputed amount into an escrow account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 10.2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

394.25.

(a) The commission may enforce the provisions of Sections 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2107, 2108, and 2114 against electric service providers as if those electric service providers were public utilities as defined in these code sections. Notwithstanding the above, nothing in this section grants the commission jurisdiction to regulate electric service providers other than as specifically set forth in this part. Electric service providers shall continue to be subject to the provisions of Sections 2111 and 2112. Upon a finding by the commission’s executive director that there is evidence to support a finding that the electric service provider has committed an act constituting grounds for suspension or revocation of registration as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 394.25, the commission
 shall notify the electric service provider in writing and notice an expedited hearing on the suspension or revocation of the electric service provider’s registration to be held within 30 days of the notification to the electric service provider of the executive director’s finding of evidence to support suspension or revocation of registration. The commission shall, within 45 days after holding the hearing, issue a decision on the suspension or revocation of registration, which shall be based on findings of fact and conclusions of law based on the evidence presented at the hearing. The decision shall include the findings of fact and the conclusions of law relied upon.

(b) An electric service provider may have its registration suspended or revoked, immediately or prospectively, in whole or in part, for any of the following acts:

(1) Making material misrepresentations in the course
 of soliciting customers, entering into service agreements with those customers, or administering those service agreements.

(2) Dishonesty, fraud, or deceit with the intent to substantially benefit the electric service provider or its employees, agents, or representatives, or to disadvantage retail electricity customers.

(3) Where the commission finds that there is evidence that the electric service provider is not financially or operationally capable of providing the offered electric service.

(4) The misrepresentation of a material fact by an applicant in obtaining a registration pursuant to Section 394.

(c) Pursuant to its authority to revoke or suspend registration, the commission may suspend a registration for a specified period or revoke the